src/phonology/otw-phon.xfscript
!###
!# c2 management
!# some of these rules feed vowel coalescence (vCoal) below
!###

define c2o [[c2 -> o o || [m|n] _ k ] .o.
            [c2 -> o   || [m|n] _ g ] .o.
            [c2 (->) o || [a|i|o] _ k ] ]; ![c2 -> a || [m|n] _ ]
define c2a [c2 -> a || [m|n] _ ] ; 
define rmc2 [c2 -> 0] ; 

!####
!#reduplication template filling rules
!####
!numerical reduplication (for distributive numbers) has e-vocalism, verbal reduplication has VRED1
define cfill [
    CRED1 -> b      || _ [VRED1|e] b .o.
    CRED1 -> d      || _ [VRED1|e] d .o.
    CRED1 -> g      || _ [VRED1|e] g .o.
    CRED1 -> j      || _ [VRED1|e] j .o.
    CRED1 -> z      || _ [VRED1|e] z .o.
    CRED1 -> z h    || _ [VRED1|e] z h .o.
    CRED1 -> m      || _ [VRED1|e] m .o.
    CRED1 -> n      || _ [VRED1|e] n .o.
    CRED1 -> w      || _ [VRED1|e] w .o.
    CRED1 -> y      || _ [VRED1|e] y .o.
    !and initial Cw words?
    !{Trying to get RED-ateg to come out as tateg in addition to the historically expected yateg (<ayateg)
    !be alert to VRED1 actually needing to be filled by the historical vowel (too little data to know at the moment... though this innovation presupposes word is now C-initial)
    !by rights there shouldn't be fortis-initial words (all had initial short V), 
    !not sure about RED-v_otherC words, though I expect something similar
    CRED1 VRED1 shortv (->) Bv1 b a    || _  b .o.
    CRED1 VRED1 shortv (->) Bv1 d a    || _  d .o.
    CRED1 VRED1 shortv (->) Bv1 g a    || _  g .o.
    CRED1 VRED1 shortv (->) Bv1  j a  || _   j .o.
    CRED1 VRED1 shortv (->) Bv1 z a    || _  z .o.
    CRED1 VRED1 shortv (->) Bv1 z h a  || _  z h .o.
    CRED1 VRED1 shortv (->) Bv1 p a    || _  p .o.
    CRED1 VRED1 shortv (->) Bv1 t a    || _  t .o.
    CRED1 VRED1 shortv (->) Bv1 k a    || _  k .o.
    CRED1 VRED1 shortv (->) Bv1 c h a  || _  c h .o.
    CRED1 VRED1 shortv (->) Bv1 s a    || _  s .o.
    CRED1 VRED1 shortv (->) Bv1 s h a  || _  s h .o.
    !and former V-cluster words?
    !}
    !{guessing what to do with simplified clusters in the dict (gVt->gt->t in the dict)/dict entries that lack the initial vowel
    !CRED1 VRED1 -> Bv1 b a    || _  b .o.
    !CRED1 VRED1 -> Bv1 d a    || _  d .o.
    !CRED1 VRED1 -> Bv1 g a    || _  g .o.
    !CRED1 VRED1 -> Bv1  j a  || _   j .o.
    !CRED1 VRED1 -> Bv1 z a    || _  z .o.
    !CRED1 VRED1 -> Bv1 z h a  || _  z h .o.
    CRED1 VRED1 -> Bv1 p a    || _  p .o.
    CRED1 VRED1 -> Bv1 t a    || _  t .o.
    CRED1 VRED1 -> Bv1 k a    || _  k .o.
    CRED1 VRED1 -> Bv1 c h a  || _  c h .o.
    CRED1 VRED1 -> Bv1 s a    || _  s .o.
    CRED1 VRED1 -> Bv1 s h a  || _  s h .o.
    !}
    CRED1 -> 0
    ];

define fortite [ !I'm inclined to think we had lenition in the reduplicant rather than fortition in the base, but that would require a huge amount of fieldwork to get the right representations
    b (->) p || VRED1 _ .o.
    d (->) t || VRED1 _ .o.
    g (->) k || VRED1 _ .o.
    j (->) c h || VRED1 _ .o.
    z (->) s || VRED1 _ .o.
    z h (->) s h || VRED1 _ 
    ]; 

define vfill [ !this will be tripped up by cluster-initial words (probably good to make an error here, because I don't know how they are reduplicated
    [..] -> y           || VRED1      _ vowel          .o. !initial onsetless words !gii-baa-RED-izhaa -> gii-baa-ayizhaa -> gii-baa-yizhaa AK story (Valentine 909)
    VRED1 -> a a        ||            _ cons [a a|i i]      .o. 
    VRED1 (->) e        ||            _ cons e              .o. 
    VRED1 -> [a a|e]    ||            _ cons o o            .o. !Valentine only lists aa for oo reduplication, but we have bebooni-zegim
    a (->) a a          || VRED1 cons _ \[a]           .o. !stem internal lengthening under reduplication
    VRED1 -> a          ||            _ cons [i|a|o|e]     !Valentine p 915 has ? for what to do with o
    ] ;

!###
!#abnormal rule to get rid of L1 before it causes trouble. note, the behavior of the vowel preceding L1 before a suffix is not known
!###

define L1del [ L1 -> 0 || _ ? ] ; 

!####
!#normal rules
!####

!##Conjunct order rules
define ccnjexcrspec [ [n5] -> i n || "PV/CCNJ+" _ ] ; !updated to make this lexically specific 
!define ccnjexcrgen [ [..] (->) i n || "PV/CCNJ+" _ d ] ; !original rule
define n5Del        [ [n5] -> 0 ] ; 
define ccnjlong  [i i -> X2 a a, a a -> X2 a y a a, e -> X2 a y e, o o -> X2 w a a || "PV/CCNJ+" (cseqs) _ ] ; !changed forms, X2 is a blocker to stop changed short from getting fed by this rule
define ccnjshort [[i|a] -> X2 e, o -> X2 (w)e || "PV/CCNJ+" (cseqs) _ ] ; !changed forms
!define ccnjexcr [[..] (->) n || X2 (w|y)[e|a a] _ d ,, [..] (->) m || X2 (w|y)[e|a a] _ b ] ; !this is incorrect afaik. use ccnjexcrspec
define rmccnj       [["PV/CCNJ+"|X2] -> 0] ;
define cnjHiatus    [c1 -> y || vowel _ vowel] ; !V-final hiatus
define cnjVoi       [s -> z  || nas c1 _ ] ; !nas-final negation
define d2k          [d2 c1 g -> k || _ [.#.|y1] ] ; !d-final vii cnj 0sg ends in k, not dg !but 'harrow' e-baazgobjigemgakin has k, not dg, so it seems to not just be word-final. what are the cases where we need d2 c1 g -/> k?
define d2d2fuse       [d2 %> d2 -> d ] ; !ngod loses d before d-initial forms
define d2del        [d2 c1 -> 0 || _ s ] ; !d-final vii loses d before s
define d2d          [d2 -> d] ;
define cnjRmC1      [c1 -> 0] ; !no more use for special c1
define cnjD1Gnas    [d1 -> g || nas _ ]; !oft-duplicated d1->g change (envi mildly different above
define d1pal    [[d|d1] -> j || _ y1 vowel ]; !palatalization in participles, targets d now because -d `+3' in VTA 3C pattern does not fuse like d1 does, but it does palatalize
define cnjD1d       [d1 -> d]; !elsewhere d1
!define cnjW4nas     [[..] -> h || w4 e n2 _ ]; !third person dub nasalization, Medler didn't do this MOVE TO ERROR MODEL
define dubw4Del     [w4 -> 0 || i3 cseqs vowel codaseqs _ ];
define i3toi        [i3 -> i i];
define cnjW4w       [w4 -> w || _ vowel]; !w4 non-o realization
define cnjw4Del     [w4 -> 0]; !elsewhere
define cnjb1b       [b1 -> b]; !assimilator b now b

!other rules
define m2pseudoV [[..] -> a || .#. _ m2 ] ; 
define m2Del   [m2 (->) 0 ] ; 
define m2Assim [m2 -> n || _ d ,, m2 -> m || _ b] ; 
define w6Coal  [w6 i -> o || _ \[i]] ; 
define w6ToW   [w6  -> w ] ; 
define vtiVoi [m1 s -> n z ] ; !nas-final negation (duplicating a little!)
define complen [m1 -> a || _ [m|n]] ;
define m1n      [m1 n4 -> n] ;
define n4n      [n4 -> n] ;
define m1m      [m1 -> m] ;
define w2nas [ w2 -> 0 || _ (vowel) [m|n|n2|n3]]; !not n1 (former lateral)
define w2def [ w2 -> w ];
!define tdPal [d -> j, t -> c h || _ i2 ] ; !combined with NSpal this is derivational morphology palatalization, though specifying the double morpheme boundary seemed redundant ... I couldn't find any VTAs that end in t|d, but if there are, there could be unexpected palatalization in the imperative and cnj(?) and local theme sign ADD TO CASCADE (combine with NSpal? ... -(i)we triggers NS pal (Valentine p 407)
define NSpal [s1 -> s h, n1 -> z h, d -> j, t -> c h || _ i2 ]; 
define Salv [s1 -> s];
!define Npal [n1 -> z h || _ i2];  !this is now part of NSpal
define i2def [i2 -> i];
define Nalv [n1 -> n]; 

define ny [[y|y1] -> h || n _ [%-|.#.]] ;

!define apocope [ [shortv] -> 0 ||  cons _ .#. ,, !cons specified because 'i' in 'ii' shouldn't delete
!                 [w|y|absv|w1|w2|y1] -> 0 || _ .#.]; !these rules apply "at the same time"
!accounting for word-minimality
define apocope [ [shortv] -> 0 || [[shortv cseqs shortv ]|[longv (cseqs shortv)]] cseqs _ .#. ,, !cons specified because 'i' in 'ii' shouldn't delete
                 [L1|w|y|absv|w1|w2|y1] -> 0 || [[shortv cseqs shortv ]|[longv (cseqs shortv)]] (cseqs) _ .#.]; !these rules apply "at the same time"

!EF: proposal for iEpen inserted between underlyingly illegal consonant clusters
!insert [i] between non-strident non-nasals and a consonant that isn't [h] or [w]
!we don't insert before h because the postalveolar(?) fricatives are spelled <sh> and <zh>
!this could be a problem if we do insert [i] between a consonant and a glottal stop, which is spelled <h>
!leaving w4 here for now rather than just moving iEpen after it in cascade after w4 deletion, in case current position is currently important
!alternative to all this is to just add a suffix boundary after [ang], so that ccEpen takes care of it
define iEpen  [[..] -> i || \[nas|s (h)|z (h)|vowel] _ \[w|h|vowel] ];
define hw2w [ [h w -> h, h w -> [w::1] || _ .#.] .o. !this could probably be trimmed to just word-finally (there should not be any word final shw by this point of the derivation)
            [w i -> o || \[s|c|n|z] h _ ] .o. !reinstating a specific version of wiCoal here because there are ho sequences from hwi in Medler, but the next rule ensures that "correct" surface forms have wi (and wiCoalescence in error modelwould not apply to make it o, because that would make Vo)
            [h w -> w || \[s|z|c|n] _ ]] ; !afaik, in all other environments glottal-w clusters are reduced to w. see note immediately below
            !hw seqs are in VTA URs for historical reasons, but the h's never seem to appear. Rhodes 1985b says h in some forms, w in others. Following Bloomfield 1958:9 (who says there are word-final h's. this is quite clearly true for hw verbs in Minnesota Ojibwe), we allowed the h to appear when word final (bc this rule is bled by glidedel), otherwise, w (this was a guess). There are quite clear cases of hw verbs becoming w verbs (giishkaw in AM!), so the rule has become more of an either-or, and moved to counter-bleed glidedel

define glidedel [[w|y|w1|w2|y1] -> 0 || cons _ .#. ];

define y2y  [y2 -> y ];
define n2del  [ n2 (->) 0 || _ .#. ]; !deleting n2s are strictly Odawa, variable in Medler
define n2def  [ n2 -> n];
define vvvDel [ shortv -> 0 // _ longv, longv _ ]; 

!I don't think it can be included with vCoal (but can't remember why)
!define Ecoal [e1 shortv -> e] ; 
! this saves contemptives/diminutives from getting aa:
!define bleedvCoal [a1 e1 -> e]; !obsolesced by a1toe

define y1Coal [y1 shortv -> i ];
define w1Coal [w1 [i|e1] -> o]; 
define w1Coal2 [w1 a -> o]; !only Odawa
!define w1Faith [w1 a -> w a]; !other dialects
define w1Short [w1 -> o || .#. (cseqs) [a|i|o] cseqs _ .#. ]; 
define w1Del [w1 -> 0]; 
!define nyCoal [shortv -> i || n y _ ];
!define wiCoal [w i (->) o]; !Medler does this (could be more widespread, optional?) !this makes awi -> ao, feeding vCoal -> aa ... which is right, but mandatory AFAIK in some contexts MOVE TO ERROR MODEL

!will need to apply vowel deletion over nasal
!giigoonhe1ns -> giigoons
!but not giigoonhag -> *giigoonhg (giigoonyag)
define vCoal [shortv -> o || [o|o1|o3] _ ,, shortv -> i || [i|i1] _ ,,  shortv -> a || [a|a1] _ ];
define weirdStr [ [..] -> %& || shortv _ cseqs o3 %> %> ]; !hoping this helps with the wiingash problem. we'll see though
define delo3 [o3 -> 0 || _ [.#.|%> %>] ];
define o3o [o3 -> o];


!these handle contemptive/diminutive allomorphy
!define lenPreNas [ e1 -> e || _ nastrig];
define lenPreNas [e1 -> e || _  nastrig,,
                    [..] -> o || \o o _ nastrig ,,
                    [..] -> i || \i i _ nastrig ,,
                    [..] -> a || \a a _ nastrig ];

define Ei [e1 -> i];

!devoicing, final lowering is written by non-Rhodes spelling (i->e not standard)
!define devoice [b -> p, d -> t, g -> k || _ .#.];
!define finlowo  [o  ->  a || _ .#.];  ! SNM: had to split the rule in two - it
!define finlowi  [i (->) e || _ .#.];  ! is not possible to combine -> and (->) in the same rule the way it was.

define str1 [ [..] -> %& || vowel _ vowel, vowel vowel _, e _ ];
define str2 [ [..] -> %& || shortv _ (codaseqs) [%-|.#.] ];
define str3 [ [..] -> %& // shortv cseqs shortv _ ];
